Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 252 Apiaries

252.010
Definitions. [Repealed.]

252.020.
State Entomologist is State Inspector of Apiaries; to combat bee diseases. [Repealed.]

252.030.
Inspector may appoint deputies. [Repealed.]

252.040.
Inspector to examine apiaries semiannually. [Repealed.]

252.050.
Apiarist to notify inspector of disease. [Repealed.]

252.060.
Inspector to examine suspected apiary; to disinfect himself. [Repealed.]

252.070.
Diseased bees and appurtenances to be burned; apiarist to assist. [Repealed.]

252.080.
Inspector may order treatment; uncured bees to be destroyed. [Repealed.]

252.090.
Removal of bees near diseased apiary to moveable combs. [Repealed.]

252.100.
Inspector may require statement of destruction or treatment. [Repealed.]

252.110.
Apiary products not to be sold if disease discovered. [Repealed.]

252.120.
Prohibited traffic in apiary products; diseases to be reported and assistance rendered. [Repealed.]

252.130.
Imported bees to have certificates of health. [Repealed.]

252.140.
Candy used in mailing bees. [Repealed.]

252.150.
Compensation of deputies. [Repealed.]

252.160.
Inspector to make annual report — Publication. [Repealed.]

252.170.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

252.180

to

252.240

, and KRS

252.990

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Bees” means any stage of the common hive or honey bee (apis mellifica) or other bees kept for the production of honey or wax;

“Bee diseases” means American or European foul brood, sacbrood, bee paralysis, disappearing disease, Isle of Wight disease, or any other disease or abnormal condition of the egg, larval, pupal or adult stages of bees;

“Apiary” means any place where one (1) or more colonies or nuclei of bees are kept;

“Queen apiaries” means any apiary in which queen bees shall be reared for sale or gift;

“Hive” means any modern frame hive, box hive, box, barrel, log gum, skep, or any other receptacle, natural or artificial, or any part thereof which may be used as a domicile for bees;

“Appliances” means any honey house, used tools, machines, or devices used in the handling or manipulation of bees, honey, wax, or used hives. It shall also mean any container of honey, or wax, which may be used in an apiary;

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture or any division thereof to which the administration of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

may be delegated by the Commissioner of Agriculture; and

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 182, § 1; 1986, ch. 9, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

252.180.
State apiarist and deputies — Police powers.

The Commissioner may appoint a competent person as state apiarist, and such number of deputy state apiarists as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

, and fix their compensation. The state apiarist and deputy state apiarists shall be vested with the powers of police officers in the enforcement of the provisions of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 182, § 2; 1986, ch. 9, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.

252.185.
Kentucky beekeeping fund.

The Kentucky beekeeping fund is hereby established in the State Treasury as a separate trust and agency account to be administered by the Department of Agriculture.

Moneys in this fund shall be used to help improve, promote, protect, and support the beekeeping industry in Kentucky, particularly relative to small beekeepers.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year, including interest, shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year to be used for purposes set forth in this section.

The fund may receive gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds both public and private.

The Department of Agriculture shall cooperate with Kentucky State University’s apiculture extension program to advance the goals set out in subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 117, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2008). The word “account” was inadvertently omitted following “agency” in subsection (1) of this section. It has been inserted by the Reviser of Statutes in codification under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(h).

252.190.
Rules and regulations for control of bee diseases — Destruction of infected bees, hives, etc. — Reporting and publication of information — Registration fees — Failure to comply a violation of statutes.

The Commissioner may make and enforce such rules and orders as in his judgment may be necessary to control, eradicate or prevent the introduction, spread or dissemination of any and all bee diseases. In the control or eradication of dangerous bee diseases the Commissioner may destroy by burning or otherwise any infected bees, hives, honey or appliances that he may deem necessary for such control or eradication, without remuneration to the owner. Such infected bees, hives, honey and appliances shall be deemed a public nuisance.

The Commissioner may publish information concerning the inspection of bees or bee diseases as he deems necessary to the carrying out of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

.

The Commissioner may order persons owning or possessing bees to report information the Commissioner deems necessary for the discharge of his duties under the provisions of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

.

The Commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations concerning how moneys are received and dispensed in the Kentucky beekeeping fund established in KRS

252.185

.

The Commissioner may establish a schedule of registration fees to be used for carrying out the provisions of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

.

Any person failing to comply with the rules and orders of the Commissioner shall be guilty of a violation of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 182, § 3; 1986, ch. 9, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 2008, ch. 117, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, date of adoption and effective date, KRS

13A.330

.

ALR

Liability for injury or damage caused by bees. 86 A.L.R.3d 829.

Keeping bees as nuisance. 88 A.L.R.3d 992.

Beekeeping regulation: validity and construction, 55 A.L.R.4th 1223.

252.200.
Quarantine.

For the purposes of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

the Commissioner may establish and maintain quarantines prohibiting the shipment into or within the state, or any subdivision thereof of any bees, queen bees, used hives or any part thereof, used appliances or any material capable of transmitting any bee diseases, for such periods and under such conditions as he may deem necessary to control, eradicate or prevent the introduction, spread, or dissemination of any and all bee diseases, giving such notice thereof as may be prescribed by the Commissioner, and during the existence of such order no person shall remove or ship from such area any such material whatever except by special permission or order of the Commissioner; provided, however, that before the Commissioner shall promulgate the order of quarantine as provided in this section, the Commissioner shall, after due notice to interested persons, give a public hearing under such rules and regulations as the Commissioner shall prescribe, at which hearing any interested person may appear and be heard, either in person or by attorney.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 182, § 4; 1986, ch. 9, § 4, effective July 15, 1986.

252.210.
Appeal from order of Commissioner or state apiarist — Hearing.

Any person in interest or affected by any order of the Commissioner or state apiarist may appeal therefrom to the Commissioner within five (5) days of the service of the order upon him setting forth in writing specifically and in full detail the order on which a hearing is desired, and every reason why the order is deemed unreasonable.

On receipt of an appeal the Commissioner shall order a hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. An appeal shall suspend the operation of the order appealed from except as to the orders of the Commissioner promulgating a quarantine as provided in KRS

252.200

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 182, § 5; 1996, ch. 318, § 180, effective July 15, 1996.

252.220.
Registration of apiaries — Fees — Certificates — Use of revenues. [Repealed.]

252.230.
Revocation of registration certificate. [Repealed.]

252.240.
Right of access to premises to enforce law.

For the purposes of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

the Commissioner or his duly authorized representatives shall have access and egress to any apiary or any premises, buildings or other place, public or private, in which he has reason to believe that bees, honey, wax, used hives or used appliances are kept, and any and all persons who shall resist, or hinder the Commissioner or his duly authorized representative in the discharge of his duties under the provisions of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

shall be guilty of a violation of KRS 252.180 to 252.240, provided, however, that no occupied dwelling may be entered without a search warrant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 182, § 8; 1986, ch. 9, § 5, effective July 15, 1986.

252.250.
Publication of reports, financial statements, information, and rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

252.990.
Penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100). In addition to the penalty hereinbefore provided, bees or combs, used hives, or other used apiary appliances brought into this state in violation of the provisions of KRS

252.180

to

252.240

shall be confiscated and destroyed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 182, § 10; 1986, ch. 9, § 6, effective July 15, 1986.